Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 6
BONDS - FUNDING - FLOATING DEBT

30-35-601. Funding bonds - determination of indebtedness.

The governing body of a home rule county may issue negotiable coupon bonds, to be denominated funding bonds, for the purpose of funding any of the legal floating indebtedness of the county, whether such indebtedness is existing on or is created on or after June 8, 1981. The specific indebtedness to be funded and the amount of such funding bonds to be issued under the provisions of this part 6 shall first be determined by the governing body and a certificate of such determination shall be made and entered in and upon the records of the county prior to the issuance of said funding bonds. Nothing in this part 6 shall be construed to repeal or amend any law limiting the indebtedness of the county.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1475, § 1, effective June 8.

30-35-602. Floating indebtedness defined.

The term "floating indebtedness", as used in this article, includes all obligations of the county to pay money, of whatever kind or character, except indebtedness evidenced by the outstanding, negotiable interest-bearing bonds of the county.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1475, § 1, effective June 8.

30-35-603. Bond election - judgments.

Whenever the governing body deems it expedient to issue funding bonds under the provisions of this article, it shall direct, by ordinance, that the question be submitted, at a regular election, in the manner provided for authorization of other bonded indebtedness in section 30-35-201 (6). At any election held under the provisions of this part 6, the question of authorizing the funding of all or any part of the floating indebtedness of the county may be submitted as one question of determination, irrespective of the form or date of such indebtedness. The election shall be conducted as nearly as may be in conformity with the provisions of the general election laws. The election notice shall specify, in addition to the time and places for holding said election, the qualifications for persons to vote on such question, the amount of the indebtedness to be funded, and the amount of funding bonds proposed to be issued at the rate of interest they shall bear. At such election, the ballots or voting machine tabs shall contain the words "For the Funding Bonds" and "Against the Funding Bonds".

No election shall be necessary to authorize the governing body of a home rule county to issue bonds for the purpose of funding indebtedness in the form of a valid subsisting judgment against the county.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1475, § 1, effective June 8.

30-35-604. Ordinance - form and maturity of bonds.

If the governing body determines to issue funding bonds for the purpose of paying and discharging any valid and subsisting judgment against the county or if, upon canvassing the vote cast at any election held under the provisions of this part 6, it is determined by the governing body that a majority of the legal votes cast upon the question submitted are in favor of funding, the governing body shall make such determination a part of the official records of the county, and the governing body shall immediately thereafter adopt an ordinance, which shall not be subject to the referendum provisions of any law, providing for the issue of said funding bonds in accordance with the provisions of this article. Such ordinance shall fix the date of said funding bonds; shall designate the denominations thereof, the rate of interest, the maturity date which shall not be more than twenty-five years from the date of said funding bonds, and the place of payment, within or without the state of Colorado, of both principal and interest; and shall prescribe the form of said funding bonds.

Such funding bonds shall be negotiable in form, shall recite the title of the act under which they are issued, shall be executed in the name of the county and signed by the executive officer, countersigned by the treasurer, and attested by the county clerk and recorder and shall have the seal of the county affixed thereto. The interest accruing on such funding bonds shall be evidenced by interest coupons thereto attached, bearing the engraved facsimile signature of the treasurer of the county. When so executed such coupons shall be the binding obligations of the county, according to their import. In the adoption of said ordinance providing for the issue of such funding bonds, the governing body shall make the principal of the debt payable in substantially equal annual installments during the period, not exceeding twenty-five years, within which the debt is to be discharged. The date of the maturity of the first installment of the debt shall be not more than five years from the date of said funding bonds.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1476, § 1, effective June 8.

30-35-605. Disposition of bonds.

All such funding bonds may be exchanged, dollar for dollar, in satisfaction of the indebtedness to be funded, or they may be sold at not less than their par value, as directed by the governing body, and the proceeds thereof shall be applied only to the purpose for which such funding bonds were issued.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1476, § 1, effective June 8.

30-35-606. Taxes for interest and redemption.

The interest accruing on such funding bonds issued pursuant to the provisions of this part 6 prior to the time when tax levies are available therefor shall be paid out of the general revenues of the county. For the purpose of reimbursing such general revenues and for the payment of subsequently accruing interest, the governing body issuing such funding bonds, or the proper tax assessing and collecting officers upon whom shall devolve the duty of levying and collecting county taxes, shall levy annually a sufficient tax upon all of the taxable property in the county fully to discharge such interest. For the ultimate redemption of such funding bonds, they shall levy annually such a tax upon all the taxable property in the county as will create a fund sufficient to discharge each annual installment of such funding bonds at the maturity thereof, which fund shall be called the redemption fund. All taxes for interest on and for the redemption of such bonds shall be paid in cash only and shall be kept by the county treasurer as a special fund to be used only in payment of the interest upon and for the redemption of such bonds. Such tax shall be levied and collected as other county taxes are levied and collected. The tax provisions for the ultimate redemption of such bonds shall be set forth in the ordinance authorizing their issue and shall set forth the years in which such taxes shall be levied for the creation of said redemption fund.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1477, § 1, effective June 8.

30-35-607. Ordinance irrepealable.

Any ordinance authorizing an issue of funding bonds under the provisions of this part 6 and providing for the levy of taxes for the payment of the interest upon the principal of such funding bonds shall not be altered or repealed until the indebtedness thereby authorized has been fully paid.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1477, § 1, effective June 8.